Utah statutes.
63B-6-111.    Bond proceeds -- Deposits -- Investment -- Disposition of
investment income and unexpended proceeds.
(1) (a)  Proceeds from the sale of bonds issued under this chapter shall be
deposited within one or more accounts as determined by resolution of the
commission.
(b)  The state treasurer shall administer and maintain these accounts unless
otherwise provided by the commission by resolution.
(c)  The commission by resolution may provide for the deposit of these monies
with a trustee and the administration, disposition, or investment of these
monies by this trustee.
(2) (a)  The commission by resolution shall provide for the kinds of
investments in which the proceeds of bonds issued under this chapter may be
invested.
(b)  Income from the investment of proceeds of bonds issued under this chapter
shall be applied as provided by resolution of the commission.
(3)  Any unexpended bond proceeds issued under this chapter shall be
deposited, upon completion of the purposes for which the bonds were issued, in
the sinking fund, unless otherwise provided in the resolution of the
commission authorizing the issuance of bonds under this chapter.
